Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 29 Inmates of State Facilities
12-29-506. Duties of Attorney General — Assistance.

The Attorney General shall enforce this subchapter.

However, the Attorney General may refer to the prosecuting attorney of the county from which the inmate in the Division of Correction or the person residing in a Division of Community Correction facility was sentenced, or to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which any property or estate of the inmate or person is located, to investigate or assist in legal proceedings to obtain the reimbursements for the cost of care of the inmate or person, as authorized in this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (a); and inserted “or the person residing in a Department of Community Correction facility” in (b).

The 2017 amendment, in (b), substituted “the inmate or person” for “any such inmate” following “estate of” and “inmate or person” for “such prisoners” following “care of”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (b).

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “or the Department of Community Correction” in (a)(1); and substituted “Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction” for “department” twice in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout (a).

Cross References. State General Government Fund, §19-5-302.

Because the state was entitled to the $5,016.61 in appellant's inmate account under the Arkansas State Prison Inmate Care and Custody Reimbursement Act, §§12-29-501 to12-29-507, for a portion of the cost of housing appellant, the court ordered the deposit of that money into the state treasury in accordance with subdivision (a)(1) of this section.MacKool v. State, 2012 Ark. 287, 423 S.W.3d 28 (2012).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 715, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1707; 2013, No. 289, § 5; 2017, No. 250, § 25; 2019, No. 910, § 810.

12-29-507. Deposit of recovered moneys — Payment of costs.

(1)All moneys recovered for the cost of care of prisoners in a facility of the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction under this subchapter shall be deposited into the State Treasury.

The Treasurer of State shall credit the moneys to the appropriate fund established by law from which appropriations to the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction are made for inmate care and custody at the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction.

However, the cost of making any investigation necessary to secure the reimbursements provided under this subchapter shall be paid from the reimbursement secured under this subchapter in those instances in which the General Assembly has not otherwise provided funds to defray the cost of the investigations.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 715, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1706; 2013, No. 289, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 811.

Subchapter 6

— Satisfaction of Restitution Orders Through Damage Awards

12-29-601. Compensatory damages paid to satisfy restitution orders.

Any compensatory damages after payment of attorney's fees and costs awarded to a prisoner in connection with a civil action brought against any state or local jail, prison, or correctional facility, or against any official or agent of such jail, person, or correctional facility, shall be paid directly to satisfy any outstanding restitution orders pending against the prisoner.

The remainder of any such award after full payment of all pending restitution orders shall be forwarded to the prisoner.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 524, § 1.

12-29-602. Immunity not affected.

The provisions of this subchapter are not intended to in any way affect the immunity from suit granted to state officials and employees under §19-10-305 or to the state and its official agencies under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 20.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 524, § 2.